Wyoming, session 2026, SF0071.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The Wyoming office of homeland security created
in the Wyoming Homeland Security Act is hereby transferred
from the office of the governor to the Wyoming department
of homeland security, as created in this act, on July 1,
2026. All property, equipment, obligations and unexpended
funds of the office of homeland security are transferred to
the department of homeland security, except as provided in
this section.
(b) The following shall apply to the reorganization
specified in subsection (a) of this section:
(i) No plan of reorganization under W.S.
9-2-1707(a)(iii) for the transfer of the office of homeland
security from the office of the governor to the department
of homeland security shall be required;
(ii) Upon the creation of the department of
homeland security in accordance with this act, the governor
shall appoint a director of the department. Nothing in this
paragraph shall prevent the governor from appointing the
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
director who was appointed under W.S. 19-13-104(d) as the
director of the department;
(iii) Upon the transfer of the office of
homeland security under this section, the department of
homeland security shall assume all duties and authorities
granted under Wyoming law.
(c) Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair
any existing contracts, agreements or other obligations of
the Wyoming office of homeland security executed before the
effective date of this act. The Wyoming department of
homeland security shall, to the greatest extent authorized
by law, fulfill existing agreements, contracts and other
obligations of the office of homeland security from funds
transferred under this act or other funds appropriated to
the department of homeland security for those purposes. To
the extent that the office of homeland security has
outstanding contracts, agreements or other obligations that
cannot be assumed lawfully by the department of homeland
security, the office of the governor shall assume those
contracts, agreements or other obligations.
(d) The following shall be transferred to the Wyoming
department of homeland security on July 1, 2026, subject to
subsection (c) of this section:
(i) Any unexpended, unobligated funds
appropriated to the office of homeland security or to the
office of the governor, homeland security division
(department 001, division 1100) during the 2026 budget
session;
(ii) Any full-time or part-time positions
provided or granted to the office of homeland security or
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
to the office of the governor, homeland security division
(department 001, division 1100) during the 2026 budget
session;
(iii) Any other unexpended, unobligated funds
that the office of homeland security is authorized to
maintain on and after July 1, 2026.
(e) Not later than October 1, 2026, the department of
homeland security shall report to the joint judiciary
interim committee on the transfer required under this act.
Section 2. W.S. 9-2-2022 is created to read:
9-2-2022. Wyoming department of homeland security
created.
As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government,
there is created the Wyoming department of homeland
security consisting of the Wyoming office of homeland
security created in the Wyoming Homeland Security Act. The
department of homeland security shall not be subject to a
transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A
reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.
Section 3. W.S. 5-11-101(a)(intro), 7-19-106(a)(xiv),
7-19-201(e), 9-2-1102(a)(xix), 18-3-402(a)(xxvi),
19-13-102(a)(v), 19-13-103(a)(i), 19-13-104(a), (d)(intro),
(i) and by creating a new paragraph (vii), 19-13-105(a),
(b), (c)(intro), (i), (d) and (e), 19-13-113(c),
19-13-117(a) through (c), (e)(intro), (ii) and (g),
19-13-301(b) and (c)(intro), 19-13-302(a) and (b),
19-13-303(a)(intro), 19-13-501(a)(iii) and (v),
24-12-102(c)(intro) and (i)(A), 31-2-234(b),
35-9-152(a)(viii), (x) and (xii), 35-9-153(a)(intro), (c),
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(e) and (g), 35-9-154(a)(intro), 35-9-155(d)(intro),
35-9-156(a) and 35-9-157(c)(iii) are amended to read:
5-11-101. Wyoming court security commission created;
membership; powers and duties; compensation; report
required.
(a) The Wyoming court security commission is created
under the supervision of the Wyoming supreme court. The
commission shall be composed of the director of the office
department of homeland security or his the director's
designee and nine (9) additional members who shall be
appointed for a term of three (3) years commencing July 1,
2008, who may be reappointed to serve subsequent terms.
The nine (9) additional members shall include:
7-19-106. Access to, and dissemination of,
information.
(a) Criminal history record information shall be
disseminated by criminal justice agencies in this state,
whether directly or through any intermediary, only to:
(xiv) The office department of homeland security
for purposes of obtaining background information on
prospective homeland security workers and regional
emergency response team participants;
7-19-201. State or national criminal history record
information.
(e) The Wyoming military department, any public fire
department, ambulance service or regional emergency
response team may as a condition of employment or other
participation with the entity require all applicants for
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
employee or volunteer positions with the entity to submit
to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national
criminal history record information. In addition, the
office department of homeland security may as a condition
of participation in a regional emergency response team
require all team participants to submit to fingerprinting
in order to obtain state and national criminal history
record information.
9-2-1102. Commission; composition; appointment of
members; removal; terms; officers; vacancies; meetings.
(a) The commission shall consist of thirteen (13)
voting members to be appointed by the governor and who may
be removed by the governor as provided in W.S. 9-1-202. The
voting members shall be appointed from each of the
following associations and agencies from their membership:
(xix) The Wyoming office department of homeland
security.
18-3-402. Duties generally.
(a) The county clerk shall:
(xxvi) Report all conveyances, as defined by
W.S. 19-13-501(a)(i), to the director of the office
department of homeland security and the division of
criminal investigation in accordance with W.S. 19-13-501
and 19-13-502.
CHAPTER 13
WYOMING DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY
19-13-102. Definitions.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) As used in this act:
(v) "Director" means the director, office of the
department of homeland security appointed pursuant to W.S.
19-13-104;
19-13-103. Legislative determination; coordination
with federal government and other states.
(a) Because of the possibility of the occurrence of
disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness
resulting from enemy attack, sabotage, terrorism, civil
disorder or other hostile action, or from fire, flood,
earthquake, other natural causes and other technological
disasters, and to insure that preparations of Wyoming will
be adequate to deal with such disasters, and generally to
provide for the common defense and to protect the public
peace, health and safety, and to preserve the lives and
property of the people of Wyoming, it is hereby found and
declared to be necessary:
(i) To create a Wyoming office department of
homeland security, within the governor's office, and to
authorize the creation of local homeland security programs
in the political subdivisions of the state;
19-13-104. Powers of governor generally; director,
department of homeland security.
(a) The governor has general direction and control of
the office of homeland security, and is and, if delegated
under this subsection, the director are responsible for the
carrying out of the provisions of this act, and in the
event of disaster beyond local control, the governor may
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
assume direct operational control over all or any part of
the homeland security functions within Wyoming. The
governor may delegate such any powers specified in this
section to the director established under subsection (d) of
this section, or through the director to the deputy
director to carry out this act.
(d) The position of the director, office of the
department of homeland security is created in the
governor's office and shall be appointed by the governor.
He shall be responsible to the governor and The director
may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S. 9-1-202.
The director shall:
(i) Supervise the Wyoming office department of
homeland security;
(vii) Prepare and submit a budget for the
department of homeland security in accordance with W.S.
9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.3.
19-13-105. Homeland security program.
(a) The office department of homeland security within
the governor's office is created. The governor director
shall appoint a deputy director of the office department of
homeland security, with the approval of the governor. The
director may appoint such assistants as may be necessary.
The director and his the director's assistants shall be
compensated in an amount to be determined and fixed by the
Wyoming human resources division of the department of
administration and information. The deputy director shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed as
provided in W.S. 9-1-202 director.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) The director may employ technical, clerical,
stenographic and other personnel and make such expenditures
within the appropriations or from other funds made
available to him the director for purposes of homeland
security as necessary to carry out this act. He The
director shall be provided with necessary and appropriate
office space, furniture, equipment, stationery and printing
in the same manner as for personnel of other state
agencies.
(c) The director is the administrative head of the
Wyoming office department of homeland security. In addition
to the duties described in W.S. 19-13-104(d), the director:
(i) Shall be responsible, to in consultation
with the governor and in accordance with this act, for the
implementation of the state program for homeland security
for Wyoming;
(d) The deputy director shall perform duties as
assigned by the director and, in the absence of the
director, he is the administrative head of the Wyoming
office department of homeland security.
(e) The office department of homeland security may
receive and share criminal identification, intelligence and
criminal history information available to law enforcement
agencies for the purposes provided by W.S. 19-13-103.
19-13-113. State and political subdivisions exempt
from liability; exceptions; license to practice not
required; homeland security worker defined; recognized
educational programs; real estate owners exempt from
liability; criminal history record information.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) As used in this section, "homeland security
worker" includes any full or part-time paid, volunteer or
auxiliary employee of any state, territories or possessions
of the United States, the District of Columbia, any
neighboring country, any political subdivision thereof, or
any agency or program performing homeland security services
at any place in this state subject to the order or control
of or pursuant to a request of the state government or any
political subdivision thereof and includes instructors and
students in recognized educational programs where homeland
security services are taught. A recognized educational
program includes programs in educational institutions duly
existing under the laws of this state and such other
educational programs as are established by the office
department of homeland security or otherwise under this
act.
19-13-117. Lifesaver programs; process for grants;
administration; account established; rules; grant criteria.
(a) The office department of homeland security shall
administer a lifesaver program to provide grants to
counties for search and rescue designed to quickly find a
person suffering from Down syndrome, brain injuries,
autism, Alzheimer's or other dementia related disorders who
wanders and becomes lost and missing. The program shall
operate on a county basis, under which participants wear
transmitters to allow the county sheriff's departments to
electronically locate participants if necessary.
(b) The office department of homeland security shall
establish by rule and regulation an application procedure
and calendar for grants under this section and adopt other
rules as necessary to implement this section.
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) In administering this program, the office
department of homeland security and counties shall
establish a policy of including private sector participants
to the fullest extent possible unless a viable private
sector solution does not exist.
(e) The office department of homeland security shall
provide grants, subject to the following:
(ii) The director of the office department of
homeland security shall prioritize the grant awards in
accordance with the respective needs of each county for
tracking services and the availability of local funding
sources, as documented in the applications submitted.
(g) The lifesaver program account is created. The
account shall consist of those funds appropriated to the
account by the legislature and all monies received from
federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts,
transfers, bequests and donations to the account. The
office department of homeland security is specifically
empowered to accept grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and
donations to the account. Funds in the account shall only
be expended by the office department of homeland security
for the purpose of providing grants under this section.
19-13-301. Search and rescue account; created;
expenditures.
(b) Revenues deposited within the search and rescue
account shall be expended by the Wyoming office department
of homeland security to reimburse counties for costs
directly incurred in a specific search and rescue
operation, subject to W.S. 19-13-302 and rules and
regulations adopted by the Wyoming search and rescue
10

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
council. Expenditures for reimbursement pursuant to this
subsection shall receive priority over all other authorized
account expenditures. No revenues deposited within the
account shall be used to reimburse counties for any salary
or benefits normally paid to its employees.
(c) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the
Wyoming office department of homeland security may expend
revenues available within the search and rescue account for
other search and rescue program purposes including:
19-13-302. Search and rescue account administration.
(a) Any county sheriff's office in this state may
make a claim on the search and rescue account for
reimbursement of costs directly incurred in the performance
of search and rescue activities. Any claim made pursuant to
this subsection shall be submitted to the Wyoming office
department of homeland security. Upon receipt, the Wyoming
office department of homeland security shall transmit the
claim to the Wyoming search and rescue council for review
and action in accordance with subsection (b) of this
section.
(b) The Wyoming search and rescue council shall
review and act upon all claims submitted under subsection
(a) of this section no later than June 30 following the
year in which expenses were incurred for the claim
submitted. If there are insufficient funds to pay all
approved claims, the Wyoming office department of homeland
security shall prorate reimbursement among all approved
claims. Payments authorized through the Wyoming office
department of homeland security pursuant to this section
shall be paid by the state treasurer by warrant issued by
the state auditor upon vouchers signed by the director, of
11

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the Wyoming office department of homeland security or his
the director's designee.
19-13-303. Search and rescue council; appointment;
vacancies; compensation; duties.
(a) The Wyoming search and rescue council is
established and shall consist of eleven (11) voting
members. The director of the Wyoming office department of
homeland security, or his the director's designee, shall
serve as a voting member and the permanent executive
secretary to the council. The governor shall appoint the
remaining ten (10) members to serve four (4) year terms as
follows:
19-13-501. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(iii) "Critical infrastructure zone" means an
area of property, whether covering the surface estate,
mineral estate, pore space estate or nonphysical property,
designated by the governor in consultation with the
director of the office department of homeland security as
property encompassing critical infrastructure;
(v) "Director" means the director of the office
department of homeland security appointed under W.S.
19-13-104;
24-12-102. Duties generally; emergencies;
coordination.
(c) The state highway patrol shall coordinate with
local, tribal, state and federal law enforcement agencies,
12

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the Wyoming office department of homeland security and any
other appropriate entity to operate an alert system under
the integrated public alert and warning system or successor
system, adhering to the United States department of justice
criteria. The state highway patrol shall operate and
integrate additional missing persons alert communications
networks that enable and help facilitate search efforts for
an adult at risk or other missing person of an age, needs
or circumstances that may fall outside the scope of the
America's missing: broadcast emergency response alert
criteria. The state highway patrol shall report annually to
the division of criminal investigation the number of times
and dates that the alert systems were used, the age, race
and gender of the abducted person, whether the abduction
was thwarted and whether an alert system assisted in
resolving the abduction. In addition:
(i) If the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the Northern
Arapaho Tribe or the cooperative tribal governing body:
(A) Operate or seek to operate an alert
system under the integrated public alert and warning system
or successor system on the Wind River Indian Reservation,
adhering to the United States department of justice
criteria, or operate or seek to operate an additional
missing persons alert communications network also operated
by the state, the Wyoming office department of homeland
security and state highway patrol shall assist and
coordinate with any tribal agency in establishing,
integrating or operating that system;
31-2-234. Search and rescue license plates.
(b) The fees collected under subsection (a) of this
section shall be payable to the department or county
13

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
treasurer and shall be accounted for separately. Except as
otherwise provided by law, the fees collected under
subsection (a) of this section shall be distributed to the
search and rescue account within the office department of
homeland security as created in W.S. 19-13-301. Funds
distributed to the search and rescue account under this
section shall be administered in accordance with the
following:
(i) The funds deposited in the search and rescue
account under this section are continuously appropriated to
the office department of homeland security and shall only
be used for the purposes provided in W.S. 19-13-301(b) and
19-13-301(c);
(ii) The office department of homeland security
may establish methods to accept voluntary contributions in
support of search and rescue activities for deposit into
the search and rescue account. The office department of
homeland security may suggest and solicit specific
contribution amounts;
(iii) The department, in consultation with the
Wyoming office department of homeland security, is
authorized to receive and credit to the search and rescue
account, any money or property of any kind or character
donated, granted or bequeathed to Wyoming search and rescue
activities. The office department of homeland security
shall have the authority to carry out the terms, if any, of
the grant, donation or bequest, or in the absence of any
terms or limitations, to expend the money or the proceeds
of the property as it may deem advisable for search and
rescue activities under the provisions of this section and
W.S. 19-13-301.
14

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
35-9-152. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(viii) "Regional emergency response team" means
any group of local government emergency responders brought
together and supported by the state and confirmed by the
director, office department of homeland security to assist
an affected jurisdiction within the different regions of
the state with the intent to protect life and property
against the dangers of incidents and emergencies involving
hazardous materials or weapons of mass destruction;
(x) "Director, office department of homeland
security" means as defined in W.S. 19-13-102(a)(v);
(xii) "Weapons of mass destruction" means as
defined in 18 U.S.C. 2332(a) as of April 1, 2004, or as
subsequently defined by rules and regulations of the
director, office department of homeland security;
35-9-153. State emergency response commission;
creation; duties.
(a) There is created a state emergency response
commission that shall consist of members appointed by the
governor to advise the director, office department of
homeland security and the department of homeland security
with respect to activities under this act. The commission
shall consist of not less than four (4) members
representing the mining, trucking, manufacturing, energy
and railroad industries, one (1) member each from the
legislature, local government, local law enforcement, fire
services, the Eastern Shoshone tribe, the Northern Arapaho
tribe, homeland security, the media, the medical field,
15

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
emergency medical services and the general public, and one
(1) representative from each of the following state
agencies:
(c) The commission shall appoint a chairman and other
officers deemed necessary from among its members. The
commission may meet as often as deemed necessary by a
majority of the commission or at the request of the
director, office department of homeland security.
Commission members who are not state employees may be
reimbursed for per diem and mileage for attending
commission meetings in the same manner and amount as state
employees.
(e) The commission shall review collection and
disbursement of funds and advise the director, office
department of homeland security on activities and
responsibilities under this act.
(g) The commission shall perform all duties and acts
prescribed by 42 U.S.C. 11001 et seq., and all other
applicable law, with the assistance of the Wyoming office
department of homeland security and other state agencies
determined to be necessary by the commission.
35-9-154. Emergency response training, planning and
reporting.
(a) After consultation with the commission and the
state fire marshal, the director, office department of
homeland security shall:
35-9-155. Regional response teams; rulemaking.
16

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(d) The director, office department of homeland
security, in consultation with the state fire marshal and
subject to approval by the state emergency response
commission, shall:
35-9-156. Local response authority.
(a) Every political subdivision of the state shall
designate a local emergency response authority for
responding to and reporting of hazardous material or
weapons of mass destruction incidents that occur within its
jurisdiction. The designation of a local emergency response
authority and copies of any accompanying agreements and
other pertinent documentation created pursuant to this
section shall be filed with the director, office department
of homeland security within seven (7) days of the agreement
being reduced to writing and signed by all appropriate
persons.
35-9-157. Right to claim reimbursement.
(c) Local emergency response authorities and regional
emergency response teams shall be entitled to recover their
reasonable and necessary costs incurred as a result of
their response to a hazardous material or weapons of mass
destruction incident. Costs subject to recovery under this
act include, but are not limited to, the following:
(iii) A reasonable fee, as established through
rules and regulations of the director, office department of
homeland security, for the use of equipment, including
rolling stock, in responding to a hazardous materials or
weapons of mass destruction incident outside the
responders' normal jurisdiction;
17

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4. W.S. 11-14-118(a), (b), (d) and (e)(ii) is
amended to read:
11-14-118. Registration of ammonium nitrate.
2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 92, provides this
section is effective on and after July 1, 2009 only upon
certification of the governor to the secretary of state
that the United States department of homeland security has
published final federal rules under H.R. 2764, Subtitle J,
Secure Handling of Ammonium Nitrate or its successor. As
of the date of the publication of the 2009 Wyoming statutes
no such certification had been made.
(a) Any person who possesses ammonium nitrate or
regulated ammonium nitrate materials shall be registered
with the department. The registration application shall be
on a form approved by the director in consultation with and
upon the recommendation of the director of the office
department of homeland security. The director shall charge
an annual registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars
($50.00). Nothing in this section shall require the
registration of any person who produces, sells or purchases
ammonium nitrate exclusively for use in the production of
an explosive under a license or permit issued under chapter
40 of title 18, U.S.C.
(b) Ammonium nitrate and regulated ammonium nitrate
materials shall be secured to provide reasonable protection
against vandalism, theft or other unauthorized use.
Reasonable protection may include, but not be limited to,
ensuring that storage facilities are fenced and locked when
unattended, and inspected daily for signs of attempted
entry or vandalism to any storage facility. The director
in consultation with or upon the recommendation of the
18

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
director of the office department of homeland security, may
recommend other security measures. The director shall work
in consultation with or upon the recommendation of the
director of the office department of homeland security to
provide information to ammonium nitrate users on
appropriate security measures.
(d) Registrants shall comply with all federal and
state requirements regarding the dissemination of any
information, providing the director and the director of the
office department of homeland security access to the
records.
(e) For the purposes of this section:
(ii) "Regulated ammonium nitrate materials"
means regulated ammonium nitrate material fertilizer
products which have been determined by the director in
consultation with and upon the recommendation of the
director of the office department of homeland security to
warrant regulation based on the potential explosive
capacity of the fertilizer material determined by the
ammonium nitrate content.
Section 5. W.S. 31-1-202(d), as amended by 2025
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 35, Section 2 and effective
July 1, 2027, is amended to read:
31-1-202. Records.
(d) The department shall maintain records of vehicle
registrations from all counties indexed by distinctive
vehicle numbers assigned by the department, the name of the
registered owner and vehicle identification numbers. The
department shall maintain a record of all vehicle
19

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
certificates of title from all counties in the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113.
Records are public and open to inspection by the public
during reasonable office hours. The department shall
maintain a vehicle identification number index of all
vehicles for which certificates of title have been issued.
Upon receipt of a notice of issuance of a certificate of
title from any county clerk the department may destroy all
records relating to former transfers of title to the
vehicle and shall retain only the notice of issuance of the
certificate of title in effect at any time. The department
may annually compile and publish a list of all registered
vehicles and supplements thereto which shall be furnished
to Wyoming peace officers and the Wyoming office department
of homeland security without charge.
20

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0071
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 6.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 1 and 6 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
21